Louisiana, session 2026, SB218.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:59.4(D)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§59.4. The Louisiana Voter Registration Administrators' Certification Program;
requirements; compensation
* * *
D.(1) The requisite education and training will be provided through courses
of the Certified Elections Registration Administrator program administered through
Auburn University and the Election Center, a national certification designation, or
a substantially equivalent program approved by the State Board of Election
Supervisors. Any course taken by a registrar of voters, chief deputy registrar, or
confidential assistant shall be a course that is required for the attainment of
certification or maintenance of such certification.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.